District of Columbia statutes.
46-306.10

Effect of registration for modification.

A tribunal of the District may enforce a child support order of another state registered for purposes of modification, in the same manner as if the order had been issued by a tribunal of the District, but the registered order may be modified only if the requirements of § 46-306.11, § 46-306.13, or § 46-306.15 have been met.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 610, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(f)(8), 53 DCR 3634

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-346.10.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137 substituted “§ 46-306.11, § 46-306.13, or § 46-306.15” for “§ 46-306.11”; and deleted “(modification of child support order of another state)” following “§ 46-306.11”.

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 610 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).